Louisiana, session 2026, HB1081.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 34:5221(A), 5223(A)(1), (4), and (5), and 5224(D) are hereby
amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§5221. Creation; purpose
A. The Louisiana Ports and Waterways Investment Commission, referred to
as the "commission" in this Chapter, is hereby created within the governor's office
of multimodal commerce, Department of Transportation and Development. The
domicile of the council shall be East Baton Rouge Parish.
* * *
§5223. Powers and duties of the commission
A. The commission shall:
(1) Represent the public interest in the administration of this Chapter and
shall be responsible to the governor commissioner of multimodal commerce, the
legislature, and the public.
* * *
(4) Advise the governor commissioner of multimodal commerce on
problems concerning the administration of the commission and the functions and
operations of Louisiana ports.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1081 ENROLLED
(5) Make reports and recommendations on its own initiative or upon the
request of the governor commissioner of multimodal commerce, the legislature, or
any committee or member thereof.
* * *
§5224. Development of the strategic plan and investment program
* * *
D. The strategic plan and investment program shall receive an appropriation
upon the agreement of the governor commissioner of multimodal commerce and the
legislature.
Section 2. R.S. 36:509(A)(4) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§509. Transfer of agencies to Department of Transportation and Development
A. The following agencies are hereby transferred to the Department of
Transportation and Development and shall exercise and perform their powers, duties
functions, and responsibilities as provided by law:
* * *
(4) The Louisiana Ports and Waterways Investment Commission (R.S.
34:5221 et seq.) shall be placed within the office of multimodal commerce,
Department of Transportation and Development.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.